Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-358
Ditches, drains, or watercourses; use by landowners.

The owner of any land, lot or premises that have been assessed for the payment of the cost of the location and construction of any ditch, drain or watercourse, as hereinbefore provided, shall have the right to use the ditch, drain or watercourse as an outlet for lateral drains from said land, lot or premises.

Laws 1905, c. 161, § 27, p. 631;

R.S.1913, § 1853;

C.S.1922, § 1800;

C.S.1929, § 31-457;

R.S.1943, § 31-358.

This section is only special provision conferring special rights in the use of drainage ditches, and does not authorize use for purpose of irrigation. Drainage Dist. No. 1 v. Suburban Irr. Dist., 139 Neb. 333, 297 N.W. 645 (1941).